Utah statutes.
49-14-402.   Calculation of retirement allowance.
(1)  A retiree under this system shall receive an allowance equal to:
(a)  2.5% of final average monthly salary multiplied by the number of years of
service credit, limited to 20 years; plus
(b)  2% of final average monthly salary, multiplied by the number of years of
service credit in excess of 20 years.
(2)  Except as modified by cost-of-living adjustments, an allowance under this
system may not exceed 70% of a retiree's final average monthly salary.
